Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 42. Fingerprinting in Connection with Business Transaction.

§ 59.1-478.
Fingerprinting in connection with business, commercial or financial transaction.

Whenever any person requires another to furnish a fingerprint or fingerprints in conjunction with any business, commercial or financial transaction, unless the parties otherwise agree, within twenty-one days of the transaction’s completion or termination
the original record of such prints and all copies of such prints, including electronic or facsimile copies shall be (i) returned to the person providing such prints or (ii) destroyed by the person requiring and obtaining such prints.

The provisions of this section shall not apply in the case of fingerprints affixed to instruments governed by

Titles 8.3
A and 8.4.

History.
1999, c. 715.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Pharmacist may obtain fingerprint from customer as proof of customer’s identification. —

Prior to filling a prescription, a pharmacist may obtain a fingerprint from a customer as proof of the customer’s identification, provided that the pharmacist returns or destroys the fingerprint within 21 days of the transaction’s completion or termination.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable K. Mike Fleenor Jr., Commonwealth’s Attorney for Pulaski County, 01-086, (1/11/02).